Maine, session 132, LD1392.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1495, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 495, §1, is amended to
read:
1. Employer. "Employer" means a person that maintains an office or otherwise
transacts business a legal address in this State and makes payment of wages taxable under
Title 36, Part 8 to a resident or nonresident individual. For the purposes of this subsection,
"legal address" means the mailing address the employer requesting the payroll processing
services uses with the United States Internal Revenue Service.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.